test/src/morphology/V-nehiyawe_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Verb - nêhiyawê - ok : # Ordinary IA verb - full paradigm, "Speak Cree"
     nêhiyawê+V+IA+Ind+Prs+1Sg: ninêhiyawân
     nêhiyawê+V+IA+Ind+Prs+2Sg: kinêhiyawân
     nêhiyawê+V+IA+Ind+Prs+3Sg: nêhiyawêw
     nêhiyawê+V+IA+Ind+Prs+3oSg: nêhiyawêyiwa
     nêhiyawê+V+IA+Ind+Prs+1Pl: ninêhiyawânân
     nêhiyawê+V+IA+Ind+Prs+12Pl: kinêhiyawânaw
     nêhiyawê+V+IA+Ind+Prs+2Pl: kinêhiyawânâwâw
     nêhiyawê+V+IA+Ind+Prs+3Pl: nêhiyawêwak
     nêhiyawê+V+IA+Ind+Prs+3oPl: nêhiyawêyiwa

     nêhiyawê+V+IA+Cnj+1Sg: ê-nêhiyawêyân
     nêhiyawê+V+IA+Cnj+2Sg: ê-nêhiyawêyan
     nêhiyawê+V+IA+Cnj+3Sg: ê-nêhiyawêt
     nêhiyawê+V+IA+Cnj+3oSg: ê-nêhiyawêyit
     nêhiyawê+V+IA+Cnj+1Pl: ê-nêhiyawêyâhk
     nêhiyawê+V+IA+Cnj+12Pl: ê-nêhiyawêyahk
     nêhiyawê+V+IA+Cnj+2Pl: ê-nêhiyawêyêk
     nêhiyawê+V+IA+Cnj+3Pl: ê-nêhiyawêcik
     nêhiyawê+V+IA+Cnj+3oPl: ê-nêhiyawêyit
     
     nêhiyawê+V+IA+Imp+Imm+2Sg: nêhiyawê
     nêhiyawê+V+IA+Imp+Imm+2Pl: nêhiyawêk
     nêhiyawê+V+IA+Imp+Imm+12Pl: nêhiyawêtân
     
     nêhiyawê+V+IA+Imp+Del+2Sg: nêhiyawêhkan
     nêhiyawê+V+IA+Imp+Del+2Sg: nêhiyawêhkêk
	 nêhiyawê+V+IA+Imp+Del+2Sg: nêhiyawêhkahk
